Indiana, session 2026, HB1347.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-33-12-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.144-2024,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 8. (a) This section applies to tax revenue
collected from a riverboat operating from Lake County.
(b) Except as provided by IC 6-3.1-20-7, the treasurer of state shall
quarterly pay the following amounts from the taxes collected during the
preceding calendar quarter from the riverboat operating from East
Chicago:
(1) The lesser of:
(A) eight hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($875,000);
or
(B) thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the
admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax collected by the
licensed owner during the preceding calendar quarter;
to the fiscal officer of the northwest Indiana regional development
authority to partially satisfy East Chicago's funding obligation to
the authority under IC 36-7.5-4-2.
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


(2) The lesser of:
(A) two hundred eighteen thousand seven hundred fifty dollars
($218,750); or
(B) thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the
admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax collected by the
licensed owner during the preceding calendar quarter;
to the fiscal officer of the northwest Indiana regional development
authority to partially satisfy Lake County's funding obligation to
the authority under IC 36-7.5-4-2.
(3) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, the
remainder, if any, of:
(A) thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the
admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax collected by the
licensed owner during the preceding calendar quarter; minus
(B) the amount distributed to the northwest Indiana regional
development authority under subdivision (1) for the calendar
quarter;
must be paid to the city of East Chicago.
(4) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, the
remainder, if any, of:
(A) thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the
admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax collected by the
licensed owner during the preceding calendar quarter; minus
(B) the amount distributed to the northwest Indiana regional
development authority under subdivision (2) for the calendar
quarter;
must be paid to Lake County.
(5) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, three
percent (3%) of the admissions tax and supplemental wagering
tax collected by the licensed owner during the preceding calendar
quarter must be paid to the county convention and visitors bureau
for Lake County.
(6) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, three
hundred thirty-three thousandths percent (.333%) of the
admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax collected by the
licensed owner during the preceding calendar quarter must be
paid to the northern Indiana law enforcement training center.
(7) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, five percent
(5%) of the admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax
collected by the licensed owner during the preceding calendar
quarter must be paid to the state fair commission for use in any
activity that the commission is authorized to carry out under
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


IC 15-13-3.
(8) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, three and
thirty-three hundredths percent (3.33%) of the admissions tax and
supplemental wagering tax collected by the licensed owner during
the preceding calendar quarter must be paid to the division of
mental health and addiction.
(9) Twenty-one and six hundred sixty-seven thousandths percent
(21.667%) of the admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax
collected by the licensed owner during the preceding calendar
quarter must be paid to the state general fund.
(c) Except as provided by IC 6-3.1-20-7, the treasurer of state shall
quarterly pay the following amounts from the taxes collected during the
preceding calendar quarter from each riverboat operating in Gary:
(1) The lesser of:
(A) four hundred thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars
($437,500); eight hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($875,000); or
(B) thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the
admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax collected by the
licensed owner during the preceding calendar quarter;
to the fiscal officer of the northwest Indiana regional development
authority to partially satisfy Gary's funding obligation to the
authority under IC 36-7.5-4-2.
(2) The lesser of:
(A) two hundred eighteen thousand seven hundred fifty dollars
($218,750); four hundred thirty-seven thousand five
hundred dollars ($437,500); or
(B) thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the
admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax collected by the
licensed owner during the preceding calendar quarter;
to the fiscal officer of the northwest Indiana regional development
authority to partially satisfy Lake County's funding obligation to
the authority under IC 36-7.5-4-2.
(3) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, the
remainder, if any, of:
(A) thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the
admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax collected by the
licensed owner of a riverboat operating in Gary during the
preceding calendar quarter; minus
(B) the amount distributed to the northwest Indiana regional
development authority under subdivision (1) for the calendar
quarter;
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


must be paid to the city of Gary.
(4) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, the
remainder, if any, of:
(A) thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the
admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax collected by the
licensed owner of a riverboat operating in Gary during the
preceding calendar quarter; minus
(B) the amount distributed to the northwest Indiana regional
development authority under subdivision (2) for the calendar
quarter;
must be paid to Lake County.
(5) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, three
percent (3%) of the admissions tax and supplemental wagering
tax collected by the licensed owner of a riverboat operating in
Gary during the preceding calendar quarter must be paid to the
county convention and visitors bureau for Lake County.
(6) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, three
hundred thirty-three thousandths percent (.333%) of the
admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax collected by the
licensed owner of a riverboat operating in Gary during the
preceding calendar quarter must be paid to the northern Indiana
law enforcement training center.
(7) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, five percent
(5%) of the admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax
collected by the licensed owner of a riverboat operating in Gary
during the preceding calendar quarter must be paid to the state
fair commission for use in any activity that the commission is
authorized to carry out under IC 15-13-3.
(8) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, three and
thirty-three hundredths percent (3.33%) of the admissions tax and
supplemental wagering tax collected by the licensed owner of a
riverboat operating in Gary during the preceding calendar quarter
must be paid to the division of mental health and addiction.
(9) Twenty-one and six hundred sixty-seven thousandths percent
(21.667%) of the admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax
collected by the licensed owner of a riverboat operating in Gary
during the preceding calendar quarter must be paid to the state
general fund.
(d) Except as provided by IC 6-3.1-20-7, the treasurer of state shall
quarterly pay the following amounts from the taxes collected during the
preceding calendar quarter from the riverboat operating in Hammond:
(1) The lesser of:
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


(A) eight hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($875,000);
or
(B) thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the
admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax collected by the
licensed owner of a riverboat operating in Hammond during
the preceding calendar quarter;
to the fiscal officer of the northwest Indiana regional development
authority to partially satisfy Hammond's funding obligation to the
authority under IC 36-7.5-4-2.
(2) The lesser of:
(A) two hundred eighteen thousand seven hundred fifty dollars
($218,750); or
(B) thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the
admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax collected by the
licensed owner during the preceding calendar quarter;
to the fiscal officer of the northwest Indiana regional development
authority to partially satisfy Lake County's funding obligation to
the authority under IC 36-7.5-4-2.
(3) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, the
remainder, if any, of:
(A) thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the
admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax collected by the
licensed owner of the riverboat during the preceding calendar
quarter; minus
(B) the amount distributed to the northwest Indiana regional
development authority under subdivision (1) for the calendar
quarter;
must be paid to the city of Hammond.
(4) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, the
remainder, if any, of:
(A) thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the
admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax collected by the
licensed owner of the riverboat during the preceding calendar
quarter; minus
(B) the amount distributed to the northwest Indiana regional
development authority under subdivision (2) for the calendar
quarter;
must be paid to Lake County.
(5) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, three
percent (3%) of the admissions tax and supplemental wagering
tax collected by the licensed owner of the riverboat during the
preceding calendar quarter must be paid to the county convention
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


and visitors bureau for Lake County.
(6) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, three
hundred thirty-three thousandths percent (.333%) of the
admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax collected by the
licensed owner of a riverboat during the preceding calendar
quarter must be paid to the northern Indiana law enforcement
training center.
(7) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, five percent
(5%) of the admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax
collected by the licensed owner of the riverboat during the
preceding calendar quarter must be paid to the state fair
commission for use in any activity that the commission is
authorized to carry out under IC 15-13-3.
(8) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, three and
thirty-three hundredths percent (3.33%) of the admissions tax and
supplemental wagering tax collected by the licensed owner for
each person admitted to the riverboat during the preceding
calendar quarter must be paid to the division of mental health and
addiction.
(9) Twenty-one and six hundred sixty-seven thousandths percent
(21.667%) of the admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax
collected by the licensed owner of the riverboat during the
preceding calendar quarter must be paid to the state general fund.
SECTION 2. IC 4-33-13-2.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 2.5. (a) This section applies only to tax revenue:
(1) remitted by a licensed owner operating a riverboat sited at a
location approved under IC 4-33-6-4.5; and
(2) collected under this chapter after June 30, 2025.
(b) Notwithstanding section 3 of this chapter, the department shall
deposit from the tax revenue remitted under this chapter by a licensed
owner operating a riverboat sited at a location approved under
IC 4-33-6-4.5 amounts as follows:
(1) In each state fiscal year beginning after June 30, 2025, and
ending before July 1, 2027, an amount equal to the amount
deposited under IC 36-7.5-6-5(a) by the city of Gary in the
blighted property demolition fund established by IC 36-7.5-6-4,
up to three million dollars ($3,000,000).
(2) In each state fiscal year beginning after June 30, 2025, and
ending before July 1, 2045, an amount equal to the amount
deposited under IC 36-7.5-7-5(c) by an entity in the Lake County
economic development and convention fund established by
IC 36-7.5-7-5, up to five million dollars ($5,000,000).
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


(3) In each state fiscal year beginning after June 30, 2025, and
ending before July 1, 2050, an amount equal to the amount
deposited under IC 36-7.5-8-4 by the city of Gary, or on behalf of
the city of Gary from any other source, in the Gary Metro Center
station revitalization fund established by IC 36-7.5-8-3, up to
three million dollars ($3,000,000).
Any amount of tax revenue remitted under this chapter by a licensed
owner operating a riverboat sited at a location approved under
IC 4-33-6-4.5 in a state fiscal year that exceeds the amount required for
the deposits in this subsection for the state fiscal year must be
deposited in the state gaming fund under section 3 of this chapter.
(c) Budget committee review is required before any money may be:
(1) matched under subsection (b); and
(2) released to any of the following funds:
(A) The blighted property demolition fund established by
IC 36-7.5-6-4.
(B) The Lake County economic development and convention
fund established by IC 36-7.5-7-5.
(C) The Gary Metro Center station revitalization fund
established by IC 36-7.5-8-3.
(d) The northwest Indiana regional development authority
established by IC 36-7.5-2-1 shall provide any information to the
department that the department determines is necessary for the
department to carry out this section.
(e) This section expires July 1, 2050.
SECTION 3. IC 4-33-13-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2023,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. Except as provided in section 2.5 of this
chapter, The department shall deposit tax revenue collected under this
chapter in the state gaming fund.
SECTION 4. IC 4-33-13-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 109, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) This subsection does not
apply to tax revenue remitted by an operating agent operating a
riverboat in a historic hotel district. Excluding funds that are
appropriated in the biennial budget act from the state gaming fund to
the commission for purposes of administering this article, each month
the state comptroller shall distribute the tax revenue deposited in the
state gaming fund under this chapter to the following:
(1) An amount equal to the following shall be set aside for
revenue sharing under subsection (d):
(A) Before July 1, 2021, the first thirty-three million dollars
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


($33,000,000) of tax revenues collected under this chapter
shall be set aside for revenue sharing under subsection (d).
(B) After June 30, 2021, if the total adjusted gross receipts
received by licensees from gambling games authorized under
this article during the preceding state fiscal year is equal to or
greater than the total adjusted gross receipts received by
licensees from gambling games authorized under this article
during the state fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, the first
thirty-three million dollars ($33,000,000) of tax revenues
collected under this chapter shall be set aside for revenue
sharing under subsection (d).
(C) After June 30, 2021, if the total adjusted gross receipts
received by licensees from gambling games authorized under
this article during the preceding state fiscal year is less than
the total adjusted gross receipts received by licensees from
gambling games authorized under this article during the state
year ending June 30, 2020, an amount equal to the first
thirty-three million dollars ($33,000,000) of tax revenues
collected under this chapter multiplied by the result of:
(i) the total adjusted gross receipts received by licensees
from gambling games authorized under this article during
the preceding state fiscal year; divided by
(ii) the total adjusted gross receipts received by licensees
from gambling games authorized under this article during
the state fiscal year ending June 30, 2020;
shall be set aside for revenue sharing under subsection (d).
(2) Subject to subsection (c), twenty-five percent (25%) of the
remaining tax revenue remitted by each licensed owner shall be
paid:
(A) except as provided in clauses (C) and (D), to the city,
excluding the city of Gary, in which the riverboat is located
or that is designated as the home dock of the riverboat from
which the tax revenue was collected, in the case of:
(i) a city described in IC 4-33-12-6(b)(1)(A);
(ii) a city located in Lake County, excluding the city of
Gary; or
(iii) Terre Haute; or
(B) to the county that is designated as the home dock of the
riverboat from which the tax revenue was collected, in the case
of a riverboat that is not located in a city described in clause
(A) or whose home dock is not in a city described in clause
(A);
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


(C) with respect to twenty-five percent (25%) of the
remaining tax revenue remitted by each licensed owner
located in the city of Gary, each July through and
including April of the following year of each state fiscal
year, beginning in July 2026, an amount equal to the lesser
of:
(i) five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); or
(ii) twenty-five percent (25%) of the remaining tax
revenue remitted by each licensed owner located in the
city of Gary;
to be deposited in the Lake County economic development
and convention fund established by IC 36-7.5-7-5 to satisfy
Gary's funding obligation to the northwest Indiana
regional development authority under IC 36-7.5-7-5. For
purposes of this subdivision, the state comptroller shall
treat any amount distributed under this subdivision to the
northwest Indiana regional development authority as an
amount constructively received by the city of Gary; or
(D) after the distribution described in clause (C), any
remainder of:
(i) the twenty-five percent (25%) of the remaining tax
revenue remitted by each licensed owner located in the
city of Gary; minus
(ii) the amount distributed to the northwest Indiana
regional development authority under clause (C);
to the city of Gary.
(3) This subdivision expires July 1, 2050. The following apply
before July 1, 2050:
(A) After making the distributions described in
subdivisions (1) and (2), the remaining tax revenue
remitted by each licensed owner shall be distributed as
follows and in the following order of priority:
(i) In each state fiscal year beginning after June 30, 2025,
and ending before July 1, 2045, an amount equal to the
amount deposited under IC 36-7.5-7-5(c) by the
approved entity in the Lake County economic
development and convention fund established by
IC 36-7.5-7-5, up to five million dollars ($5,000,000).
However, if the required budget committee review under
clause (B) with respect to the initial match and release to
the Lake County economic development and convention
fund does not occur until the state fiscal year beginning
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


after June 30, 2026, and ending before July 1, 2027, the
amount deposited under this item shall continue through
each state fiscal year ending before July 1, 2046.
(ii) In each state fiscal year beginning after June 30,
2025, and ending before July 1, 2027, an amount equal to
the amount deposited under IC 36-7.5-6-5(a) by the city
of Gary in the blighted property demolition fund
established by IC 36-7.5-6-4, up to three million dollars
($3,000,000).
(iii) In each state fiscal year beginning after June 30,
2025, and ending before July 1, 2050, an amount equal to
the amount deposited under IC 36-7.5-8-4 by the city of
Gary, or on behalf of the city of Gary from any other
source, in the Gary Metro Center station revitalization
fund established by IC 36-7.5-8-3, up to three million
dollars ($3,000,000).
(B) Budget committee review is required before any money
may initially be matched under clause (A) and released to
any of the following funds:
(i) The Lake County economic development and
convention fund established by IC 36-7.5-7-5.
(ii) The blighted property demolition fund established by
IC 36-7.5-6-4.
(iii) The Gary Metro Center station revitalization fund
established by IC 36-7.5-8-3.
(C) In each state fiscal year after budget committee review
of the initial match and release to the funds under clause
(B), money shall be matched under clause (A) and released
to any of the following funds subject to the following
conditions:
(i) The Lake County economic development and
convention fund established by IC 36-7.5-7-5, until the
state budget director shall have received a certificate
from the public finance director appointed under
IC 5-1.2-3-6 that all indebtedness of the Indiana finance
authority and the northwest Indiana regional
development authority which is secured by the fund has
been repaid.
(ii) The blighted property demolition fund established by
IC 36-7.5-6-4, upon the state budget director's receipt of
a certificate from the fiscal officer of the northwest
Indiana regional development authority of the amount
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


deposited under IC 36-7.5-6-5(a) by the city of Gary in
the blighted property demolition fund established by
IC 36-7.5-6-4 during the state fiscal year.
(iii) The Gary Metro Center station revitalization fund
established by IC 36-7.5-8-3, upon the state budget
director's receipt of a certificate from the fiscal officer of
the northwest Indiana regional development authority of
the amount deposited under IC 36-7.5-8-4 by the city of
Gary, or on behalf of the city of Gary from any other
source, in the Gary Metro Center station revitalization
fund established by IC 36-7.5-8-3 during the state fiscal
year.
(D) The northwest Indiana regional development authority
established by IC 36-7.5-2-1 shall provide any information
to the department that the department determines is
necessary for the department to carry out this subsection.
(3) (4) The remainder of the tax revenue remitted by each
licensed owner shall be paid to the state general fund. In each
state fiscal year, the state comptroller shall make the transfer
required by this subdivision on or before the fifteenth day of the
month based on revenue received during the preceding month for
deposit in the state gaming fund. Specifically, the state
comptroller may transfer the tax revenue received by the state in
a month to the state general fund in the immediately following
month according to this subdivision.
(b) This subsection applies only to tax revenue remitted by an
operating agent operating a riverboat in a historic hotel district after
June 30, 2019. Excluding funds that are appropriated in the biennial
budget act from the state gaming fund to the commission for purposes
of administering this article, each month the state comptroller shall
distribute the tax revenue remitted by the operating agent under this
chapter as follows:
(1) For state fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2019, but
ending before July 1, 2021, fifty-six and five-tenths percent
(56.5%) shall be paid to the state general fund.
(2) For state fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2021, fifty-six
and five-tenths percent (56.5%) shall be paid as follows:
(A) Sixty-six and four-tenths percent (66.4%) shall be paid to
the state general fund.
(B) Thirty-three and six-tenths percent (33.6%) shall be paid
to the West Baden Springs historic hotel preservation and
maintenance fund established by IC 36-7-11.5-11(b).
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


However, if:
(i) at any time the balance in that fund exceeds twenty-five
million dollars ($25,000,000); or
(ii) in any part of a state fiscal year in which the operating
agent has received at least one hundred million dollars
($100,000,000) of adjusted gross receipts;
the amount described in this clause shall be paid to the state
general fund for the remainder of the state fiscal year.
(3) Forty-three and five-tenths percent (43.5%) shall be paid as
follows:
(A) Twenty-two and four-tenths percent (22.4%) shall be paid
as follows:
(i) Fifty percent (50%) to the fiscal officer of the town of
French Lick.
(ii) Fifty percent (50%) to the fiscal officer of the town of
West Baden Springs.
(B) Fourteen and eight-tenths percent (14.8%) shall be paid to
the county treasurer of Orange County for distribution among
the school corporations in the county. The governing bodies
for the school corporations in the county shall provide a
formula for the distribution of the money received under this
clause among the school corporations by joint resolution
adopted by the governing body of each of the school
corporations in the county. Money received by a school
corporation under this clause must be used to improve the
educational attainment of students enrolled in the school
corporation receiving the money. Not later than the first
regular meeting in the school year of a governing body of a
school corporation receiving a distribution under this clause,
the superintendent of the school corporation shall submit to
the governing body a report describing the purposes for which
the receipts under this clause were used and the improvements
in educational attainment realized through the use of the
money. The report is a public record.
(C) Thirteen and one-tenth percent (13.1%) shall be paid to the
county treasurer of Orange County.
(D) Five and three-tenths percent (5.3%) shall be distributed
quarterly to the county treasurer of Dubois County for
appropriation by the county fiscal body after receiving a
recommendation from the county executive. The county fiscal
body for the receiving county shall provide for the distribution
of the money received under this clause to one (1) or more
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


taxing units (as defined in IC 6-1.1-1-21) in the county under
a formula established by the county fiscal body after receiving
a recommendation from the county executive.
(E) Five and three-tenths percent (5.3%) shall be distributed
quarterly to the county treasurer of Crawford County for
appropriation by the county fiscal body after receiving a
recommendation from the county executive. The county fiscal
body for the receiving county shall provide for the distribution
of the money received under this clause to one (1) or more
taxing units (as defined in IC 6-1.1-1-21) in the county under
a formula established by the county fiscal body after receiving
a recommendation from the county executive.
(F) Six and thirty-five hundredths percent (6.35%) shall be
paid to the fiscal officer of the town of Paoli.
(G) Six and thirty-five hundredths percent (6.35%) shall be
paid to the fiscal officer of the town of Orleans.
(H) Twenty-six and four-tenths percent (26.4%) shall be paid
to the Indiana economic development corporation established
by IC 5-28-3-1 for transfer as follows:
(i) Beginning after December 31, 2017, ten percent (10%)
of the amount transferred under this clause in each calendar
year shall be transferred to the South Central Indiana
Regional Economic Development Corporation or a
successor entity or partnership for economic development
for the purpose of recruiting new business to Orange County
as well as promoting the retention and expansion of existing
businesses in Orange County.
(ii) The remainder of the amount transferred under this
clause in each calendar year shall be transferred to Radius
Indiana or a successor regional entity or partnership for the
development and implementation of a regional economic
development strategy to assist the residents of Orange
County and the counties contiguous to Orange County in
improving their quality of life and to help promote
successful and sustainable communities.
To the extent possible, the Indiana economic development
corporation shall provide for the transfer under item (i) to be
made in four (4) equal installments. However, an amount
sufficient to meet current obligations to retire or refinance
indebtedness or leases for which tax revenues under this
section were pledged before January 1, 2015, by the Orange
County development commission shall be paid to the Orange
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


County development commission before making distributions
to the South Central Indiana Regional Economic Development
Corporation and Radius Indiana or their successor entities or
partnerships. The amount paid to the Orange County
development commission shall proportionally reduce the
amount payable to the South Central Indiana Regional
Economic Development Corporation and Radius Indiana or
their successor entities or partnerships.
(c) This subsection does not apply to tax revenue remitted by an
inland casino operating in Vigo County. For each city and county
receiving money under subsection (a)(2), the state comptroller shall
determine the total amount of money paid by the state comptroller to
the city or county during the state fiscal year 2002. The amount
determined is the base year revenue for the city or county. The state
comptroller shall certify the base year revenue determined under this
subsection to the city or county. The total amount of money distributed
to a city or county under this section during a state fiscal year may not
exceed the entity's base year revenue. For each state fiscal year, the
state comptroller shall pay that part of the riverboat wagering taxes
that:
(1) exceeds a particular city's or county's base year revenue; and
(2) would otherwise be due to the city or county under this
section;
to the state general fund instead of to the city or county.
(d) Except as provided in subsections (k) and (l), before August 15
of each year, the state comptroller shall distribute the wagering taxes
set aside for revenue sharing under subsection (a)(1) to the county
treasurer of each county that does not have a riverboat according to the
ratio that the county's population bears to the total population of the
counties that do not have a riverboat. Except as provided in subsection
(g), the county auditor shall distribute the money received by the
county under this subsection as follows:
(1) To each city located in the county according to the ratio the
city's population bears to the total population of the county.
(2) To each town located in the county according to the ratio the
town's population bears to the total population of the county.
(3) After the distributions required in subdivisions (1) and (2) are
made, the remainder shall be retained by the county.
(e) Money received by a city, town, or county under subsection (d)
or (g) may be used for any of the following purposes:
(1) To reduce the property tax levy of the city, town, or county for
a particular year (a property tax reduction under this subdivision
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


does not reduce the maximum levy of the city, town, or county
under IC 6-1.1-18.5).
(2) For deposit in a special fund or allocation fund created under
IC 8-22-3.5, IC 36-7-14, IC 36-7-14.5, IC 36-7-15.1, and
IC 36-7-30 to provide funding for debt repayment.
(3) To fund sewer and water projects, including storm water
management projects.
(4) For police and fire pensions.
(5) To carry out any governmental purpose for which the money
is appropriated by the fiscal body of the city, town, or county.
Money used under this subdivision does not reduce the property
tax levy of the city, town, or county for a particular year or reduce
the maximum levy of the city, town, or county under
IC 6-1.1-18.5.
(f) This subsection does not apply to an inland casino operating in
Vigo County. Before July 15 of each year, the state comptroller shall
determine the total amount of money distributed to an entity under
IC 4-33-12-6 or IC 4-33-12-8 during the preceding state fiscal year. If
the state comptroller determines that the total amount of money
distributed to an entity under IC 4-33-12-6 or IC 4-33-12-8 during the
preceding state fiscal year was less than the entity's base year revenue
(as determined under IC 4-33-12-9), the state comptroller shall make
a supplemental distribution to the entity from taxes collected under this
chapter and deposited into the state general fund. Except as provided
in subsection (h), the amount of an entity's supplemental distribution
is equal to:
(1) the entity's base year revenue (as determined under
IC 4-33-12-9); minus
(2) the sum of:
(A) the total amount of money distributed to the entity and
constructively received by the entity during the preceding state
fiscal year under IC 4-33-12-6 or IC 4-33-12-8; plus
(B) the amount of any admissions taxes deducted under
IC 6-3.1-20-7.
(g) This subsection applies only to Marion County. The county
auditor shall distribute the money received by the county under
subsection (d) as follows:
(1) To each city, other than the consolidated city, located in the
county according to the ratio that the city's population bears to the
total population of the county.
(2) To each town located in the county according to the ratio that
the town's population bears to the total population of the county.
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


(3) After the distributions required in subdivisions (1) and (2) are
made, the remainder shall be paid in equal amounts to the
consolidated city and the county.
(h) This subsection does not apply to an inland casino operating in
Vigo County. This subsection applies to a supplemental distribution
made after June 30, 2017. The maximum amount of money that may be
distributed under subsection (f) in a state fiscal year is equal to the
following:
(1) Before July 1, 2021, forty-eight million dollars ($48,000,000).
(2) After June 30, 2021, if the total adjusted gross receipts
received by licensees from gambling games authorized under this
article during the preceding state fiscal year is equal to or greater
than the total adjusted gross receipts received by licensees from
gambling games authorized under this article during the state
fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, the maximum amount is
forty-eight million dollars ($48,000,000).
(3) After June 30, 2021, if the total adjusted gross receipts
received by licensees from gambling games authorized under this
article during the preceding state fiscal year is less than the total
adjusted gross receipts received by licensees from gambling
games authorized under this article during the state fiscal year
ending June 30, 2020, the maximum amount is equal to the result
of:
(A) forty-eight million dollars ($48,000,000); multiplied by
(B) the result of:
(i) the total adjusted gross receipts received by licensees
from gambling games authorized under this article during
the preceding state fiscal year; divided by
(ii) the total adjusted gross receipts received by licensees
from gambling games authorized under this article during
the state fiscal year ending June 30, 2020.
If the total amount determined under subsection (f) exceeds the
maximum amount determined under this subsection, the amount
distributed to an entity under subsection (f) must be reduced according
to the ratio that the amount distributed to the entity under IC 4-33-12-6
or IC 4-33-12-8 bears to the total amount distributed under
IC 4-33-12-6 and IC 4-33-12-8 to all entities receiving a supplemental
distribution.
(i) This subsection applies to a supplemental distribution, if any,
payable to Lake County, Hammond, Gary, or East Chicago under
subsections (f) and (h). Beginning in July 2016, the state comptroller
shall, after making any deductions from the supplemental distribution
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


required by IC 6-3.1-20-7, deduct from the remainder of the
supplemental distribution otherwise payable to the unit under this
section the lesser of:
(1) the remaining amount of the supplemental distribution; or
(2) the difference, if any, between:
(A) three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000);
minus
(B) the amount of admissions taxes constructively received by
the unit in the previous state fiscal year.
The state comptroller shall distribute the amounts deducted under this
subsection to the northwest Indiana redevelopment regional
development authority established under IC 36-7.5-2-1 for deposit in
the development authority revenue fund established under
IC 36-7.5-4-1.
(j) Money distributed to a political subdivision under subsection (b):
(1) must be paid to the fiscal officer of the political subdivision
and may be deposited in the political subdivision's general fund
(in the case of a school corporation, the school corporation may
deposit the money into either the education fund (IC 20-40-2) or
the operations fund (IC 20-40-18)) or riverboat fund established
under IC 36-1-8-9, or both;
(2) may not be used to reduce the maximum levy under
IC 6-1.1-18.5 of a county, city, or town or the maximum tax rate
of a school corporation, but, except as provided in subsection
(b)(3)(B), may be used at the discretion of the political
subdivision to reduce the property tax levy of the county, city, or
town for a particular year;
(3) except as provided in subsection (b)(3)(B), may be used for
any legal or corporate purpose of the political subdivision,
including the pledge of money to bonds, leases, or other
obligations under IC 5-1-14-4; and
(4) is considered miscellaneous revenue.
Money distributed under subsection (b)(3)(B) must be used for the
purposes specified in subsection (b)(3)(B).
(k) After June 30, 2020, the amount of wagering taxes that would
otherwise be distributed to South Bend under subsection (d) shall be
deposited as being received from all riverboats whose supplemental
wagering tax, as calculated under IC 4-33-12-1.5(b), is over three and
five-tenths percent (3.5%). The amount deposited under this
subsection, in each riverboat's account, is proportionate to the
supplemental wagering tax received from that riverboat under
IC 4-33-12-1.5 in the month of July. The amount deposited under this
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


subsection must be distributed in the same manner as the supplemental
wagering tax collected under IC 4-33-12-1.5. This subsection expires
June 30, 2021.
(l) After June 30, 2021, the amount of wagering taxes that would
otherwise be distributed to South Bend under subsection (d) shall be
withheld and deposited in the state general fund.
SECTION 5. IC 4-33-13-5.4, AS ADDED BY P.L.169-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5.4. (a) This section applies to each state
fiscal year beginning after June 30, 2026.
(b) As used in this section, "qualified city" refers to East Chicago,
Hammond, or Michigan City.
(c) As used in this section, "supplemental payment statute" refers to
IC 4-33-13-5.3, as in effect on January 1, 2025.
(d) Subject to subsections (i) and (j), a qualified city is entitled to
supplemental payments under this section for amounts not paid in state
fiscal years 2022, 2023, 2024, and 2025 under the supplemental
payment statute. The state comptroller shall determine the total amount
of supplemental payments to which each qualified city is entitled as
follows:
(1) In the case of East Chicago, an amount equal to the sum of the
following:
(A) Six million four hundred seventy-four thousand two
hundred seventy-four dollars ($6,474,274).
(B) The amount, if any, for state fiscal year 2025 for which
East Chicago is eligible under the supplemental payment
statute.
(2) In the case of Michigan City, an amount equal to the sum of
the following:
(A) Five million seven hundred fifty-two thousand one
hundred twenty-five dollars ($5,752,125).
(B) The amount, if any, for state fiscal year 2025 for which
Michigan City is eligible under the supplemental payment
statute.
(3) In the case of Hammond, an amount equal to the amount, if
any, for state fiscal year 2025 for which Hammond is eligible
under the supplemental payment statute.
(e) Subject to subsections (j) and (l), each month, after deducting
the amount required under section 5(a)(2)(C) of this chapter, the
state comptroller shall deduct an amount otherwise payable to Gary
under section 5(a)(2) 5(a)(2)(D) of this chapter, if any, for the purpose
of this chapter, not to exceed a total of two million dollars ($2,000,000)
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


for the state fiscal year.
(f) Subject to subsections (i), (j), and (l), the state comptroller shall
annually distribute supplemental payments to each qualified city, on a
monthly basis, based on:
(1) the amount deducted under subsection (e) in the preceding
month; and
(2) one-twelfth (1/12) of the amount appropriated from the state
general fund under subsection (k).
(g) Money for the supplemental payments is sourced from:
(1) the total amount deducted under subsection (e) in the state
fiscal year; plus
(2) money appropriated by the general assembly for the state
fiscal year for the purpose of making supplemental payments
under this section.
(h) The state comptroller shall make a supplemental payment in
each state fiscal year to each qualified city in an amount determined
under the last STEP of the following formula:
STEP ONE: Divide the:
(A) total amount determined under subsection (d) for the
qualified city; by
(B) aggregate amount of supplemental payments for all
qualified cities determined under subsection (d).
STEP TWO: Multiply the:
(A) STEP ONE result; by
(B) amount of money to be used for supplemental payments in
the state fiscal year under subsections (f) and (g).
(i) A qualified city may not receive a supplemental payment in
excess of the amount determined under subsection (d) for the qualified
city.
(j) The total amount of supplemental payments made to qualified
cities in all state fiscal years may not exceed the aggregate amount of
supplemental payments determined under subsection (d).
(k) There is appropriated from the state general fund to the gaming
fund two million dollars ($2,000,000) in each state fiscal year
beginning after June 30, 2026, which may only be used to make
supplemental payments. Any amount not needed to make a
supplemental payment in a state fiscal year reverts to the state general
fund at the close of the state fiscal year and may not be used for any
other purpose.
(l) After the total amount of all supplemental payments to qualified
cities determined in subsection (d) have been made under this chapter,
the state comptroller shall continue, each month, after deducting the
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


amount required under section 5(a)(2)(C) of this chapter, to deduct
an amount otherwise payable to Gary under section 5(a)(2) 5(a)(2)(D)
of this chapter as set forth in subsection (e) not to exceed a total of two
million dollars ($2,000,000) for the state fiscal year for the purpose of
repaying to the state the total amounts appropriated from the state
general fund under subsection (k) and paid to qualified cites as
supplemental payments under this chapter. The state comptroller shall
cease the deductions under this subsection on the date that the total
amounts appropriated from the state general fund under subsection (k)
and paid to qualified cites have been repaid.
(m) This section expires July 1, 2039.
SECTION 6. IC 36-7.5-2-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE FEBRUARY 28, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 10.5.
(a) All bonds, notes, evidences of indebtedness, leases, or other
written obligations issued or executed under this article by or in
the name of the:
(1) Indiana finance authority;
(2) development authority; and
(3) city of Gary, the Lake County board of commissioners, or
the Lake County convention center authority established by
IC 36-7.5-7-9;
as authorized or approved by resolution or ordinance adopted by
the entity before February 28, 2026, are hereby legalized and
declared valid.
(b) Any pledge, dedication or designation of revenues,
conveyance, or mortgage securing the bonds, notes, evidences of
indebtedness, leases, or other written obligations issued or executed
under this article by or in the name of the:
(1) Indiana finance authority;
(2) development authority; and
(3) city of Gary, the Lake County board of commissioners, or
the Lake County convention center authority established by
IC 36-7.5-7-9;
as authorized or approved by resolution or ordinance adopted by
the entity before February 28, 2026, are hereby legalized and
declared valid.
(c) Any resolutions adopted, proceedings had, and actions taken
under this article by the:
(1) Indiana finance authority;
(2) development authority; and
(3) city of Gary, the Lake County board of commissioners, or
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


the Lake County convention center authority established by
IC 36-7.5-7-9;
before February 28, 2026, under which the bonds, notes, evidences
of indebtedness, leases, or other written obligations were or will be
issued or under which the pledge, dedication or designation of
revenues, conveyance, or mortgage was or will be granted are
hereby legalized and declared valid.
(d) An action to contest the validity of any action taken under
this article may not be brought after the fifteenth day following the
date the resolution of the:
(1) Indiana finance authority;
(2) development authority; or
(3) city of Gary, the Lake County board of commissioners, or
the Lake County convention center authority established by
IC 36-7.5-7-9;
is adopted approving the action taken.
(e) If an action challenging an action taken under this article is
not brought within the time prescribed by this section, the lease,
contract, bonds, notes, obligations, or other action taken shall be
conclusively presumed to be fully authorized and valid under the
laws of the state and any person is estopped from further
questioning the authorization, validity, execution, delivery, or
issuance of the lease, contract, bonds, notes, obligations, or other
action.
SECTION 7. IC 36-7.5-6-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.195-2023,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. (a) The blighted property demolition fund
is established to provide grants to the city of Gary to demolish qualified
properties.
(b) The fund consists of:
(1) appropriations from the general assembly;
(2) available federal funds;
(3) transfers of money under IC 4-33-13-2.5(b)(1);
IC 4-33-13-5(a)(3)(C);
(4) deposits required under section 5(a) and 5(b) of this chapter;
and
(5) gifts, grants, donations, or other contributions from any other
public or private source.
(c) The development authority shall administer the fund.
(d) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public funds may be invested.
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


(e) The money remaining in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year
does not revert to the state general fund.
(f) Money in the fund is continuously appropriated for the purposes
of this chapter.
SECTION 8. IC 36-7.5-7-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.195-2023,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) The Lake County economic
development and convention fund is established. The fund shall be
administered by the development authority.
(b) The convention fund consists of:
(1) deposits under IC 4-33-13-2.5(b)(2); IC 4-33-13-5(a)(2)(C);
(2) deposits under subsection (c);
(3) appropriations to the fund;
(4) gifts, grants, loans, bond proceeds, and other money received
for deposit in the fund; and
(5) other deposits or transfers of funds from local units located in
Lake County.
(c) If a proposal is approved as provided under this chapter, each
state fiscal year, beginning with the first state fiscal year that begins
after the proposal is approved, the approved entity shall deposit up to
five million dollars ($5,000,000) in the convention fund. The
obligation of the city of Gary, as the approved entity, for each state
fiscal year under this subsection is satisfied by the distributions
made by the state comptroller on behalf of the city of Gary under
IC 4-33-13-5(a)(2)(C). However, if the total amount distributed
under IC 4-33-13-5(a)(2)(C) on behalf of the city of Gary with
respect to a particular state fiscal year is less than the amount
required by this subsection, the fiscal officer of the city of Gary
shall transfer the amount of the shortfall to the convention fund
from any source of revenue available to the city of Gary other than
property taxes. The state comptroller shall certify the amount of
any shortfall to the fiscal officer of the city of Gary after making
the distribution required by IC 4-33-13-5(a)(2)(C) on behalf of the
city of Gary with respect to a particular state fiscal year.
(d) The development authority shall administer money, including
determining amounts to be used and the specific purposes, from the
convention fund.
(e) Except as provided in section 8(d) of this chapter, the money
remaining in the convention fund at the end of a state fiscal year does
not revert to the state general fund.
(f) Money in the convention fund is continuously appropriated for
the purposes of this chapter.
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


(g) Subject to budget committee review, but except as provided in
subsection (i), the development authority may receive reimbursement
for expenses incurred and a reasonable and customary amount for
providing administrative services from money in the convention fund.
(h) The development authority shall quarterly report to the budget
committee on all uses of money in the convention fund and the status
of the convention and event center project.
(i) The development authority shall conduct an updated feasibility
study related to a potential convention and event center located in Lake
County. The development authority shall be reimbursed for the costs
of obtaining the updated feasibility study from money in the fund.
Budget committee review is not required for reimbursement under this
subsection.
SECTION 9. IC 36-7.5-7-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.195-2023,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 9. (a) If a proposal is approved under section
8 of this chapter, following the approval of the proposal, and when the
construction of the convention and event center is substantially
completed so that the convention and event center can be used for
its intended purpose, the Lake County convention center authority is
established for the purpose of holding an equal share of ownership of
the Lake County convention and event center with the entity whose
proposal is approved and for providing general oversight of the upkeep,
improvements, and management team as outlined in the accepted
proposal. Subject to subsection (e), the convention center authority
consists of seven (7) members, appointed as follows:
(1) Three (3) members appointed by the entity whose proposal is
approved under section 8 of this chapter.
(2) Three (3) members appointed by the Lake County board of
commissioners.
(3) One (1) member appointed by the governor.
Individuals appointed to the convention center authority must be
Indiana residents and have professional experience in commercial
facility management. An appointing authority may not appoint an
attorney in active standing as a member of the authority.
(b) The term of office for a member of the board is two (2) years.
The term begins July 1 of the year in which the member is appointed
and ends on June 30 of the second year following the member's
appointment. A member may be reappointed after the member's term
has expired.
(c) A vacancy in membership must be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment. Appointments made to fill a vacancy that
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


occurs before the expiration of a term are for the remainder of the
unexpired term.
(d) The member appointed under subsection (a)(3) shall serve as the
chairperson of the convention center authority. The convention center
authority shall meet at the call of the chairperson.
(e) An individual may not be appointed to the convention center
authority if the individual is a party to a contract or agreement with the
entity whose proposal is approved, is employed by the entity whose
proposal is approved, or otherwise has a direct or indirect financial
interest in the entity whose proposal is approved under this chapter.
SECTION 10. IC 36-7.5-7-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.195-2023,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 10. (a) A local county fund known as the Lake
County convention and event center reserve fund is established to pay
for:
(1) additions;
(2) refurbishment; and
(3) budget shortfalls or other unusual costs;
of a convention and event center that is constructed using money from
the convention fund under this chapter.
(b) The reserve fund consists of:
(1) transfers under IC 6-9-2-1.5(c); and
(2) gifts, grants, donations, or other contributions from any other
public or private source.
(c) The Lake County commissioners shall administer the reserve
fund until the convention center authority is established.
Thereafter, the convention center authority shall administer the
reserve fund.
SECTION 11. IC 36-7.5-8-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.195-2023,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3. (a) The Gary Metro Center station
revitalization fund is established to provide funding for the Gary Metro
Center station revitalization project.
(b) The fund consists of:
(1) appropriations from the general assembly;
(2) available federal funds;
(3) transfers of money under IC 4-33-13-2.5(b)(3);
IC 4-33-13-5(a)(3)(C);
(4) deposits required under section 4 of this chapter; and
(5) gifts, grants, donations, or other contributions from any other
public or private source.
(c) The development authority shall administer the fund.
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116


(d) The money remaining in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year
does not revert to the state general fund.
(e) Money in the fund is continuously appropriated for the purposes
of this chapter.
(f) Subject to budget committee review, the development authority
may receive reimbursement for expenses incurred and a reasonable and
customary amount for providing administrative services from money
in the fund.
SECTION 12. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1347—LS 7013/DI 116